Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.083

Cab and chassis.

"Cab and chassis" means an incomplete vehicle manufactured and sold with only a cab, frame, and running gear.

[ 2010 c 161 s 107.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.